Utah statutes.
58-37f-201.   Controlled substance database -- Creation -- Purpose.

(1)  There is created within the division a controlled substance database.

(2)  The division shall administer and direct the functioning of the database in accordance with this chapter.

(3)  The division may, under state procurement laws, contract with another state agency or a private entity to establish, operate, or maintain the database.

(4)  The division shall, in collaboration with the board, determine whether to operate the database within the division or contract with another entity to operate the database, based on an analysis of costs and benefits.

(5)  The purpose of the database is to contain the data described in Section 58-37f-203 regarding every prescription for a controlled substance dispensed in the state to any individual other than an inpatient in a licensed health care facility.

(6)  The division shall maintain the database in an electronic file or by other means established by the division to facilitate use of the database for identification of:

(a)  prescribing practices and patterns of prescribing and dispensing controlled substances;

(b)  practitioners prescribing controlled substances in an unprofessional or unlawful manner;

(c)  individuals receiving prescriptions for controlled substances from licensed practitioners, and who subsequently obtain dispensed controlled substances from a drug outlet in quantities or with a frequency inconsistent with generally recognized standards of dosage for that controlled substance; and

(d)  individuals presenting forged or otherwise false or altered prescriptions for controlled substances to a pharmacy.



Enacted by Chapter 287, 2010 General Session

